Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-317
Designation of postal address; when; no residence; how treated.

Any registered voter whose residence address is not a permissible postal address may designate a postal address for registration records. When the election commissioner or county clerk has reason to believe that the registration residence address of a registered voter is not a permissible postal address, the election commissioner or county clerk shall attempt to determine a proper postal address for the registered voter. If a registered voter has no residence address, his or her residence address shall be deemed to be the office of the election commissioner or county clerk of the county of such voter's residence for purposes of the Election Act.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 79.